Massachusetts, session 194th, H3916.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 58A of Chapter 31 of the General Laws or any 
other general or special law to the contrary, no person shall be eligible to have their name 
certified for original appointment to the position of police officer in the City of Westfield if such 
person has reached their fortieth birthday on the date of the entrance examination. 
SECTION 2. This act shall only apply to competitive exams administered on or after the 
effective date of this act. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.